Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB494.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Enhanced support program" means a dedicated program with the express
purpose of and targeted approaches toward assisting qualified English
learners to reach grade-level proficiency within three (3) years of
enrollment in a qualified local district;
(b) "Qualified English learner" means a limited English proficiency student,
as provided in KRS 158.6455, who has been identified by the local school
district as having limited or interrupted formal education prior to the
student's enrollment at the local district; and
(c) "Qualified local district" means a local school district which provides an
enhanced support program to qualified English learners.
(2) The English learner enhanced support program is hereby established to provide
qualified English learners with targeted, results-based educational support and
teaching to improve grade-level proficiency. The program shall:
(a) Operate under the oversight of the department;
(b) Identify eligible schools or districts with heightened populations of students
with limited English proficiency for the program and select schools or
districts for participation in the program based upon available funds;
(c) Require local districts to seek out and utilize available federal funds prior to
being designated a qualified local district and being eligible for program
funds;
(d) Have a process for seeking waiver of administrative regulations as
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/11/2025 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1651
necessary to implement the program, including but not limited to permitting
certified teachers to teach qualified English learners in courses outside
their certification area where appropriate based on the academic
performance level of the qualified English learner;
(e) Provide enrolled qualified English learners with access to a structured
support system and innovative approaches offering educational services
that:
1. Provide teachers that can deliver personalized instruction matching
the student's academic performance level;
2. Offer a holistic and culturally responsive program with respect to the
specific cohort of enrolled students;
3. Implement systems to guide enrolled students with academic level
placement, promotion, and individualized goal setting; and
4. Achieve measurable academic growth for enrolled students based on
existing assessment mechanisms; and
(f) Designate qualified local districts who have otherwise met the criteria in
paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(3) The department shall select a provider to implement the program under the
department's oversight. In evaluating provider applicants, the department shall
require an applicant provider to have:
(a) At least three (3) years of experience in implementing similar services;
(b) Demonstrated success in providing structured support systems and
innovative approaches towards offering educational services for students
with limited English proficiency who have limited or interrupted formal
education; and
(c) Capabilities to:
1. Partner with qualified local school districts to serve qualified English
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/11/2025 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1651
learners;
2. Communicate with parents and other education professionals involved
in the program;
3. Update the curriculum and support services, as needed;
4. Collect necessary enrollment data of qualified English learners within
each qualified local district;
5. Collect necessary data to track progress towards grade level
proficiency;
6. Produce reports for parents, qualified local districts, schools, and the
department; and
7. Comply with state and federal education laws.
(4) The selected provider shall:
(a) Develop a recruitment plan to solicit qualified English learners for
enrollment in the enhanced support program in qualified local districts;
(b) Implement the program in compliance with subsection (3) of this section;
(c) Provide administrative and technical support to qualified local districts,
students, families, and any other involved education professionals for the
implementation of the enhanced support program;
(d) Seek the advice and expertise of local stakeholders, such as public and
private education professionals, the department, local school board
members, teachers, and parents, on the implementation of the program in
areas such as:
1. Soliciting qualified English learners to participate in the enhanced
support program in qualified local districts;
2. Providing holistic support services for qualified English learners and
education professionals in qualified local districts; and
3. Motivating enrolled students and their families to persist with the
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/11/2025 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1651
enhanced support program for at least three (3) years; and
(e) At the conclusion of each school year, report any data required by the
department to conduct an evaluation of the program's effectiveness in
attaining its purpose.
(5) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, by December 1, 2026, the department
shall submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
appropriate Interim Joint Committee on Education, that contains the following:
(a) The extent to which the program is accomplishing its objective of improving
grade-level proficiency among qualified English learners;
(b) The number of qualified English learners:
1. Enrolled in the program; and
2. Not enrolled in the program where the program has been made
available at a school in a qualified local district;
(c) The number of private and public educational entities the provider has
partnered with during the program, by qualified local district;
(d) The innovative techniques that have been implemented through the
program;
(e) Obstacles encountered with enrollment, implementation, or achieving
successful outcomes from the program; and
(f) Student performance on any assessments conducted by school districts or
public charter schools that measure student progress toward achieving
grade-level proficiency, including comparisons between qualified English
learners within the program, qualified English learners not enrolled in the
program, students with limited English proficiency, and the general student
population.
(6) The department shall implement this section to the extent that funds are
available.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/11/2025 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1651
(7) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed in the creation of standards for and the
administration of this section.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/11/2025 2:46 PM Jacketed